Utah statutes.
35A-8-428.   Investment in authority authorized.

(1)  The state, public officers, political subdivisions, public bodies, banks, bankers, trust companies, savings banks and institutions, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, investment companies, insurance companies, insurance associations, other persons carrying on a banking or insurance business, executors, administrators, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries may legally invest money or funds belonging to them or within their control in any bonds or other obligations issued by a housing authority created under this part or issued by a public housing authority or agency in the United States, a United States Territory, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, Guam, or the Virgin Islands.

(2)  These bonds or other obligations shall be secured by a pledge of annual contributions or other financial assistance to be paid by the United States government or any of its agencies, or by an agreement between the United States government or any of its agencies and the public housing authority or agency in which the United States government or its agency  agrees to lend to the public housing authority or agency, prior to the maturity of the bonds or other obligations, money in an amount which, together with any other money irrevocably committed to the payment of interest on the bonds or other obligations, will suffice to pay the principal of the bonds or other obligations with interest to maturity.

(3)  The money, under the terms of the agreement, is required to be used for this purpose, and the bonds and other obligations are authorized security for all public deposits and are fully negotiable in this state.

(4)  Nothing contained in this section relieves a person, firm, or corporation from any duty of exercising reasonable care in selecting securities.

(5)  The provisions of this section apply notwithstanding any restrictions on investments contained in other laws.

